Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Successful Transition and Reentry of Offender

42-3-30 through 42-3-35.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 1/SB 367, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 1/SB 367 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 repeal of these Code sections, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).